Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Part 11 Merger, Interest Exchange, Conversion, and Domestication [Effective January 1, 2023.]
7-13.1-1142.
Plan of conversion. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A domestic limited partnership may convert to a different type of entity under this subpart by approving a plan of conversion. The plan must be in a record and contain:

The name of the converting limited partnership;

The name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of the converted entity;

The manner of converting the interests in the converting limited partnership into interests, securities, obligations, money, other property, rights to acquire interests or securities, or any combination of the foregoing;

The proposed public organic record of the converted entity if it will be a filing entity;

The full text of the private organic rules of the converted entity which are proposed to be in a record;

The other terms and conditions of the conversion; and

Any other provision required by the law of this state or the partnership agreement of the converting limited partnership.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of this section, a plan of conversion may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-1143.
Approval of conversion [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A plan of conversion is not effective unless it has been approved:

By a domestic converting limited partnership, by all the partners of the limited partnership entitled to vote on or consent to any matter; and

In a record, by each partner of a domestic converting limited partnership which will have interest holder liability for debts, obligations, and other liabilities that are incurred after the conversion becomes effective, unless:

The partnership agreement of the partnership provides in a record for the approval of a conversion or a merger in which some or all of its partners become subject to interest holder liability by the affirmative vote or consent of fewer than all the partners; and

The partner voted for or consented in a record to that provision of the partnership agreement or became a partner after the adoption of that provision.

A conversion involving a domestic converting entity that is not a limited partnership is not effective unless it is approved by the domestic converting entity in accordance with its organic law.

A conversion of a foreign converting entity is not effective unless it is approved by the foreign entity in accordance with the law of the foreign entity’s jurisdiction of formation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-1144.
Amendment or abandonment of plan of conversion. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A plan of conversion of a domestic converting limited partnership may be amended:

In the same manner as the plan was approved, if the plan does not provide for the manner in which it may be amended; or

By its partners in the manner provided in the plan, but a partner that was entitled to vote on or consent to approval of the conversion is entitled to vote on or consent to any amendment of the plan that will change:

The amount or kind of interests, securities, obligations, money, other property, rights to acquire interests or securities, or any combination of the foregoing, to be received by any of the partners of the converting partnership under the plan;

The public organic record, if any, or private organic rules of the converted entity which will be in effect immediately after the conversion becomes effective, except for changes that do not require approval of the interest holders of the converted entity under its organic law or organic rules; or

Any other terms or conditions of the plan, if the change would adversely affect the partner in any material respect.

After a plan of conversion has been approved by a domestic converting limited partnership and before a statement of conversion becomes effective, the plan may be abandoned as provided in the plan. Unless prohibited by the plan, a domestic converting limited partnership may abandon the plan in the same manner as the plan was approved.

If a plan of conversion is abandoned after a statement of conversion has been delivered to the secretary of state for filing and before the statement becomes effective, a statement of abandonment, signed by the converting entity, must be delivered to the secretary of state for filing before the statement of conversion becomes effective. The statement of abandonment takes effect on filing, and the conversion is abandoned and does not become effective. The statement of abandonment must contain:

The name of the converting limited partnership;

The date on which the statement of conversion was filed by the secretary of state; and

A statement that the conversion has been abandoned in accordance with this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-1145.
Statement of conversion — Effective date of conversion. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A statement of conversion must be signed by the converting entity and delivered to the secretary of state for filing.

A statement of conversion must contain:

The name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of the converting entity;

The name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of the converted entity;

If the converting entity is a domestic limited partnership, a statement that the plan of conversion was approved in accordance with this subpart or, if the converting entity is a foreign entity, a statement that the conversion was approved by the foreign entity in accordance with the law of its jurisdiction of formation;

If the converted entity is a domestic filing entity, its public organic record, as an attachment; and

If the converted entity is a domestic limited liability partnership, its statement of qualification, as an attachment.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (b) of this section, a statement of conversion may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

If the converted entity is a domestic entity, its public organic record, if any, must satisfy the requirements of the law of this state, except that the public organic record does not need to be signed.

If the converted entity is a domestic limited partnership, the conversion becomes effective when the statement of conversion is effective. In all other cases, the conversion becomes effective on the later of:

The date and time provided by the organic law of the converted entity; and

When the statement is effective.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-1146.
Effect of conversion. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

When a conversion becomes effective:

The converted entity is:

Organized under and thereafter subject to the organic law of the converted entity; and

The same entity without interruption as the converting entity;

All property of the converting entity continues to be vested in the converted entity without transfer, reversion, or impairment;

All debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the converting entity continue as debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the converted entity;

Except as otherwise provided by law or the plan of conversion, all the rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes of the converting entity remain in the converted entity;

The name of the converted entity may be substituted for the name of the converting entity in any pending action or proceeding;

The certificate of limited partnership of the converted entity becomes effective;

The provisions of the partnership agreement of the converted entity which are to be in a record, if any, approved as part of the plan of conversion become effective; and

The interests in the converting entity are converted, and the interest holders of the converting entity are entitled only to the rights provided to them under the plan of conversion and to any appraisal rights they have under §

7-13.1-1106

.

Except as otherwise provided in the partnership agreement of a domestic converting limited partnership, the conversion does not give rise to any rights that a partner or third party would have upon a dissolution, liquidation, or winding up of the converting entity.

When a conversion becomes effective, a person that did not have interest holder liability with respect to the converting entity and becomes subject to interest holder liability with respect to a domestic entity as a result of the conversion has interest holder liability only to the extent provided by the organic law of the entity and only for those debts, obligations, and other liabilities that are incurred after the conversion becomes effective.

When a conversion becomes effective, the interest holder liability of a person that ceases to hold an interest in a domestic converting limited partnership with respect to which the person had interest holder liability is subject to the following rules:

The conversion does not discharge any interest holder liability under this chapter to the extent the interest holder liability was incurred before the conversion became effective.

The person does not have interest holder liability under this chapter for any debt, obligation, or other liability that is incurred after the conversion becomes effective.

This chapter continues to apply to the release, collection, or discharge of any interest holder liability preserved under subsection (d)(1) of this section as if the conversion had not occurred.

The person has whatever rights of contribution from any other person as are provided by this chapter, law other than this chapter, or the organic rules of the converting entity with respect to any interest holder liability preserved under subsection (d)(1) of this section as if the conversion had not occurred.

When a conversion becomes effective, a foreign entity that is the converted entity may be served with process in this state for the collection and enforcement of any of its debts, obligations, and other liabilities as provided in §

7-13.1-121

.

If the converting entity is a registered foreign entity, its registration to do business in this state is canceled when the conversion becomes effective.

A conversion does not require the entity to wind up its affairs and does not constitute or cause the dissolution of the entity.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-1151.
Domestication authorized. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

By complying with this subpart, a domestic limited partnership may become a foreign limited partnership if the domestication is authorized by the law of the foreign jurisdiction.

By complying with the provisions of this subpart applicable to foreign limited partnerships, a foreign limited partnership may become a domestic limited partnership if the domestication is authorized by the law of the foreign limited partnership’s jurisdiction of formation.

If a protected agreement contains a provision that applies to a merger of a domestic limited partnership but does not refer to a domestication, the provision applies to a domestication of the limited partnership as if the domestication were a merger until the provision is amended after January 1, 2023.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-1152.
Plan of domestication. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A domestic limited partnership may become a foreign limited partnership in a domestication by approving a plan of domestication. The plan must be in a record and contain:

The name of the domesticating limited partnership;

The name and jurisdiction of formation of the domesticated limited partnership;

The manner of converting the interests in the domesticating limited partnership into interests, securities, obligations, money, other property, rights to acquire interests or securities, or any combination of the foregoing;

The proposed certificate of limited partnership of the domesticated limited partnership;

The full text of the provisions of the partnership agreement of the domesticated limited partnership, that are proposed to be in a record;

The other terms and conditions of the domestication; and

Any other provision required by the law of this state or the partnership agreement of the domesticating limited partnership.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of this section, a plan of domestication may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-1153.
Approval of domestication. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A plan of domestication of a domestic domesticating limited partnership is not effective unless it has been approved:

By all the partners entitled to vote on or consent to any matter; and

In a record, by each partner that will have interest holder liability for debts, obligations, and other liabilities that are incurred after the domestication becomes effective, unless:

The partnership agreement of the domesticating partnership in a record provides for the approval of a domestication or merger in which some or all of its partners become subject to interest holder liability by the affirmative vote or consent of fewer than all the partners; and

The partner voted for or consented in a record to that provision of the partnership agreement or became a partner after the adoption of that provision.

A domestication of a foreign domesticating limited partnership is not effective unless it is approved in accordance with the law of the foreign limited partnership’s jurisdiction of formation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-1154.
Amendment or abandonment of plan of domestication. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A plan of domestication of a domestic domesticating limited partnership may be amended:

In the same manner as the plan was approved, if the plan does not provide for the manner in which it may be amended; or

By its partners in the manner provided in the plan, but a partner that was entitled to vote on or consent to approval of the domestication is entitled to vote on or consent to any amendment of the plan that will change:

The amount or kind of interests, securities, obligations, money, other property, rights to acquire interests or securities, or any combination of the foregoing, to be received by any of the partners of the domesticating limited partnership under the plan;

The certificate of limited partnership or partnership agreement of the domesticated limited partnership that will be in effect immediately after the domestication becomes effective, except for changes that do not require approval of the partners of the domesticated limited partnership under its organic law or partnership agreement; or

Any other terms or conditions of the plan, if the change would adversely affect the partner in any material respect.

After a plan of domestication has been approved by a domestic domesticating limited partnership and before a statement of domestication becomes effective, the plan may be abandoned as provided in the plan. Unless prohibited by the plan, a domestic domesticating limited partnership may abandon the plan in the same manner as the plan was approved.

If a plan of domestication is abandoned after a statement of domestication has been delivered to the secretary of state for filing and before the statement becomes effective, a statement of abandonment, signed by the domesticating limited partnership, must be delivered to the secretary of state for filing before the statement of domestication becomes effective. The statement of abandonment takes effect on filing, and the domestication is abandoned and does not become effective. The statement of abandonment must contain:

The name of the domesticating limited partnership;

The date on which the statement of domestication was filed by the secretary of state; and

A statement that the domestication has been abandoned in accordance with this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-1155.
Statement of domestication — Effective date of domestication. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A statement of domestication must be signed by the domesticating limited partnership and delivered to the secretary of state for filing.

A statement of domestication must contain:

The name and jurisdiction of formation of the domesticating limited partnership;

The name and jurisdiction of formation of the domesticated limited partnership;

If the domesticating limited partnership is a domestic limited partnership, a statement that the plan of domestication was approved in accordance with this subpart or, if the domesticating limited partnership is a foreign limited partnership, a statement that the domestication was approved in accordance with the law of its jurisdiction of formation; and

The certificate of limited partnership of the domesticated limited partnership, as an attachment.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (b) of this section, a statement of domestication may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

The certificate of limited partnership of a domesticated domestic limited partnership must satisfy the requirements of this chapter, but the certificate does not need to be signed.

If the domesticated entity is a domestic limited partnership, the domestication becomes effective when the statement of domestication is effective. If the domesticated entity is a foreign limited partnership, the domestication becomes effective on the later of:

The date and time provided by the organic law of the domesticated entity; and

When the statement is effective.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-1156.
Effect of domestication. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

When a domestication becomes effective:

The domesticated entity is:

Organized under and thereafter subject to the organic law of the domesticated entity; and

The same entity without interruption as the domesticating entity;

All property of the domesticating entity continues to be vested in the domesticated entity without transfer, reversion, or impairment;

All debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the domesticating entity continue as debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the domesticated entity;

Except as otherwise provided by law or the plan of domestication, all the rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes of the domesticating entity remain in the domesticated entity;

The name of the domesticated entity may be substituted for the name of the domesticating entity in any pending action or proceeding;

The certificate of limited partnership of the domesticated entity becomes effective;

The provisions of the partnership agreement of the domesticated entity that are to be in a record, if any, approved as part of the plan of domestication become effective; and

The interests in the domesticating entity are converted to the extent and as approved in connection with the domestication, and the partners of the domesticating entity are entitled only to the rights provided to them under the plan of domestication and to any appraisal rights they have under § 7-13.1-1116.

Except as otherwise provided in the organic law or partnership agreement of the domesticating limited partnership, the domestication does not give rise to any rights that a partner or third party would have upon a dissolution, liquidation, or winding up of the domesticating partnership.

When a domestication becomes effective, a person that did not have interest holder liability with respect to the domesticating limited partnership and becomes subject to interest holder liability with respect to a domestic limited partnership as a result of the domestication has interest holder liability only to the extent provided by this chapter and only for those debts, obligations, and other liabilities that are incurred after the domestication becomes effective.

When a domestication becomes effective, the interest holder liability of a person that ceases to hold an interest in a domestic domesticating limited partnership with respect to which the person had interest holder liability is subject to the following rules:

The domestication does not discharge any interest holder liability under this chapter to the extent the interest holder liability was incurred before the domestication became effective.

A person does not have interest holder liability under this chapter for any debt, obligation, or other liability that is incurred after the domestication becomes effective.

This chapter continues to apply to the release, collection, or discharge of any interest holder liability preserved under subsection (d)(1) of this section as if the domestication had not occurred.

A person has whatever rights of contribution from any other person as are provided by this chapter, law other than this chapter, or the partnership agreement of the domestic domesticating limited partnership with respect to any interest holder liability preserved under subsection (d)(1) of this section as if the domestication had not occurred.

When a domestication becomes effective, a foreign limited partnership that is the domesticated partnership may be served with process in this state for the collection and enforcement of any of its debts, obligations, and other liabilities as provided in §

7-13.1-121

.

If the domesticating limited partnership is a registered foreign entity, the registration of the partnership is canceled when the domestication becomes effective.

A domestication does not require a domestic domesticating limited partnership to wind up its affairs and does not constitute or cause the dissolution of the partnership.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.